Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1367
Affirmative action; cooperation.

Each agency shall cooperate with the administrator in the performance of his or her duties. The efforts, activities, and results of all directors, managers, and supervisors shall be used in their work-performance evaluations. Directors, managers, and supervisors shall be obligated to prevent harassment of employees involved in the implementation of plans and those hired through affirmative action efforts.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 13;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 22.